Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 38 Offenses Pertaining to Schools
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-38-1.
Discrimination because of race or age.

No person shall be excluded from any public school on account of race or color, or for being over fifteen (15) years of age, nor except by force of some general regulation applicable to all persons under the same circumstances.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 65, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-1

.

16-38-1.1.
Discrimination because of sex.

Discrimination on the basis of sex is prohibited in all public elementary and secondary schools in the state and in all schools operated by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education. This prohibition shall apply to employment practices, admissions, curricular programs, extracurricular activities including athletics, counseling, and any and all other school functions and activities.

Notwithstanding this prohibition, schools may do the following:

Maintain separate restrooms, dressing, and shower facilities for males and females;

Conduct separate human sexuality classes for male and female students; and

Prohibit female participation in all contact sports provided that equal athletic opportunities which effectively accommodate the interests and abilities of both sexes are made available.

Provide extracurricular activities for students of one sex, including, but not limited to, father-daughter/mother-son activities, but if such activities are provided for students of one sex, opportunities for reasonably comparable activities shall be provided for students of the other sex. School districts are required to allow and notify students that they may bring the adult of their parent’s or guardian’s choice to the event.

Each local education agency shall designate an equal opportunity officer who shall be responsible for overseeing compliance with this section within the local education agency district.

The board of regents shall designate an equal opportunity officer who shall be responsible for overseeing compliance with this section within schools operated by the board.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall be responsible for enforcing this section and is empowered to promulgate rules and regulations to enforce the provisions of this section.

Discrimination on the basis of sex is prohibited in all public colleges, community colleges, universities, and all other public institutions of higher learning in the state which are operated by the board of governors for higher education. This prohibition shall apply to employment, recruitment, and hiring practices, employment benefits, admissions, curricular programs, extracurricular activities including athletics, counseling, financial aid including athletic grants-in-aid, student medical, hospital, and accident or life insurance benefits, facilities, housing, rules and regulations, research, and any and all other school functions and activities.

Notwithstanding these prohibitions, schools may do the following:

Maintain separate but comparable restrooms, dressing, and shower facilities for males and females, including reasonable use of staff of the same sex as the users of these facilities;

Provide separate teams for contact sports or for sports where selection for teams is based on competitive skills, provided that equal athletic opportunities which effectively accommodate the interests and abilities of both sexes are made available;

Maintain separate housing for men and women, provided that housing for students of both sexes is as a whole both proportionate in quantity to the number of students of that sex that apply for housing and comparable in quality and cost to the student; and

Permit the establishment and operation of university based social fraternities and sororities.

Each individual educational institution of higher learning shall designate an equal opportunity officer or affirmative action officer who shall be responsible for overseeing compliance with this section within the educational institution.

The president of each public college, community college, university, and other public institution of higher learning in the state shall be responsible for enforcing this section and is empowered to promulgate rules and regulations to enforce the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 92, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 522, § 1.

16-38-2.
Immunization.

Every person upon entering any public or private school including any college or university in this state as a pupil shall furnish to the administrative head of the school evidence that the person has been immunized against any diseases that may from time to time be prescribed by regulation of the director of health and tested for tuberculosis, or a certificate from a licensed physician stating that the person is not a fit subject for immunization for medical reasons, or a certificate signed by the pupil, if over eighteen (18) years of age, or by the parent or guardian stating that immunization and/or testing for communicable diseases is contrary to that person’s religious beliefs. It shall be the responsibility of the administrative head of the school to secure compliance with these regulations.

Every child more than twenty-four (24) months of age, resident in the state of Rhode Island, shall be eligible to receive the immunization against meningococcal disease. The Department of Health shall include meningococcal vaccine in the department’s immunization program, established by §

23-1-44

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 65, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 10; P.L. 1915, ch. 1201, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 9; P.L. 1925, ch. 644, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-2

; P.L. 1961, ch. 133, § 4; P.L. 1968, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 406, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 34, § 1.

16-38-3.
Maintenance of nuisances in proximity to schools.

No person shall keep any swine in any pen or other enclosure, or shall keep or suffer to be kept any other nuisance, within one hundred (100) feet of any schoolhouse or within one hundred (100) feet of any fence enclosing the yard of any schoolhouse.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 65, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 5; P.L. 1956, §

16-38-3

.

16-38-4.
Exclusive clubs.

No society, secret or otherwise, no fraternity or sorority, and no club to membership in which less than the entire student body shall be eligible shall be formed in any public school or among the pupils of the public schools; provided, that this section shall not apply to class or school organizations formed and conducted exclusively for the purposes of promoting approved school activities, and subject to supervision and direction by teachers under rules and regulations prescribed by school committees.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 11; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-4

.

16-38-5.
Questionnaires invading privacy.

It shall be unlawful for any person, persons, or institution, educational or otherwise, to circulate or permit to be circulated in any school in this state any questionnaire intentionally or unintentionally framed as to ask the pupils of any school intimate questions about themselves and/or their families, trespassing upon the pupil’s constitutional rights and invading the privacy of the home, unless the questionnaire has received the approval of the department of elementary and secondary education and the local school committee. Any person, persons, or institution who is found to be guilty of a violation of this section shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1332, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-5

.

16-38-5.1.
Assignment of identification numbers to students.

Effective July 1, 2007, no public educational institution, including, but not limited to, the department of elementary and secondary education and the office of higher education, shall assign an individual identification number to a student which is identical to or incorporates the individual’s social security number.

No public educational institution shall allow the public display of a student’s social security number, or any four (4) or more consecutive numbers contained in the individual’s social security number for any purpose.

In any civil action alleging a violation of this section, the court may award damages, reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff, and afford injunctive relief against any institution which violates or proposes to violate this section.

Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit an educational institution’s use of a student’s social security number when required by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 415, § 1.

16-38-6.
Restrictions on commercial activity and fundraising in public schools.

No public school official or public school employee shall, for any purpose, solicit or exact from any pupil in any public school any contribution or gift of money or any article of value, or any pledge to contribute any money or article of value. No public school teacher shall accept payment for tutoring directly from the parents of a student under his or her instruction. If a teacher is to be assigned and compensated as a tutor for a student under his or her instruction, the assignment and compensation must be through the school department pursuant to policies and procedures adopted by the school committee. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prohibit a teacher from tutoring a student who is not concurrently under his or her instruction in the public school and receiving compensation for the tutoring from the parents of the student.

No commercial goods or services shall be sold to students in the public schools or on public school property, nor shall any commercial materials (flyers, literature, advertisements, commercial materials, or solicitations) be sent home with students from the public school, except as authorized pursuant to policies and procedures adopted by the local school committee, that shall, at a minimum, address the following:

The conduct and financial accountability of public school employees and public school officials engaged in commercial activities for the benefit of public schools;

The use of schoolchildren to deliver commercial materials to parents.

Any approved fundraising activity shall be conducted on a voluntary basis and in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the school committee, that shall, at a minimum, address the following:

The conduct and financial accountability of public school employees and public school officials engaged in fundraising activities for the benefit of public schools;

The specific circumstances, if any, for door-to-door solicitations and door-to-door sales by public school students for fundraising;

The use of schoolchildren to deliver fundraising materials to parents.

When creating a school budget pursuant to §

16-2-9(a)(9)

, school committees may budget funds for field trips, provided that:

The field trips meet Rhode Island’s basic education program regulations; and

All students have the same ability to attend the field trips.

To supplement budgeted funds, fundraising for field trips is permissible, provided that:

The fundraising activity complies with subsection (c) of this section;

Students are not required to meet individual fundraising targets as a condition of attendance on the trip; and

Parents or guardians be allowed to donate toward the cost of the trip.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall provide technical assistance to assist the school committees of the several towns and cities in the formulation of the local policies and procedures mandated by this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 10; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 10; P.L. 1928, ch. 1230, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-6

; P.L. 2000, ch. 142, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 368, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 238, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 239, § 1, effective July 8, 2021.

16-38-7.
Interest of school official in sale of textbook.

No superintendent or school committee of any city or town, or any person officially connected with the government or direction of the public schools, shall receive any private fee, gratuity, donation, or compensation in any manner for promoting the sale or the exchange of any school book, map, or chart in any public school, or be an agent for the sale or the publisher of any school textbook, or be directly or indirectly pecuniarily interested in the introduction of any school textbook; and any agency or interest shall disqualify any person acting or interested as described from holding any school office.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 65, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-7

.

16-38-8.
Offer to pay school official for sale of equipment.

No person shall offer to any public school officer any fee, commission, or compensation as an inducement to effect through the officer any sale or promotion of sale or exchange of any school book, map, chart, or school apparatus.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 65, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-8

.

16-38-9.
Liability of school officers for misconduct.

Every school officer who shall make any false certificate, or appropriate any public school money to any purpose not authorized by law, or who shall refuse for a reasonable charge to give certified copies of any official paper, or to account for or deliver to his or her successor any accounts, papers, or money in his or her hands, or shall willfully or knowingly refuse to perform any duty of his or her office, or violate any provisions of any law regulating public schools, except where a particular penalty may be prescribed, shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months, and shall be liable to an action of the case for damages to be brought by any person injured by this violation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 65, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-9

.

16-38-10.
Power of officials to visit schools.

Any school receiving aid from the state, either by direct grant or by exemption from taxation, may be visited and examined by the school committee of the city or town in which the school is situated, and by the board of elementary and secondary education or its duly authorized agents, and by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or the commissioner’s duly authorized agents, when they shall deem it advisable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 65, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-10

; P.L. 1988, ch. 585, § 1.

16-38-11.
Termination of school exemption from taxation for noncompliance.

Whenever a school shall refuse to permit visitation, when requested, or shall refuse or neglect to keep the school register and to make returns as required by law, its exemption from taxation shall thereafter cease and be determined; and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education or the superintendent of schools shall notify the assessors of taxes in the town or city where the school may be located of the refusal or neglect.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 65, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 4; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-11

.

16-38-12.
Penalty for violations.

Every person violating any provision of this chapter shall be fined not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) or be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days unless provided in this section; provided, that the penalty shall not apply to §§

16-38-4

to

16-38-6

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 12; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 77, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-12

.

16-38-13.
Remission of fines and forfeitures.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may remit all fines, penalties, and forfeitures incurred by any city or town or person under any of the provisions of this title, except the forfeiture incurred by any city or town for not raising its proportion of money.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 62, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 70, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 73, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 198, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-38-13

.

16-38-14.
Use of school district listservs.

Each school district shall adopt a policy governing the use of any listserv to distribute information to the parents or guardians of the students enrolled in the school district.

It shall be unlawful for any person or institution, educational or otherwise, to knowingly circulate, or permit to be circulated, on any such listserv information:

Related to any activity directed at the success or failure of a political party or candidate for federal, state, or municipal office; or

Promoting the solicitation or receipt of political contributions, including invitations to fundraising events, for any political party or candidate; provided, however, this section shall not prohibit the distribution of information about a candidate public forum that is open on an equal basis to all candidates for that office.

Any person or institution found guilty of a violation of this section shall be punished by a civil fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00).

For purposes of this section, “listserv” means a computer software application that allows a sender to send one email to a list, and then transparently send it on to the addresses of all subscribers to the list.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 61, § 1, effective June 25, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 67, § 1, effective June 25, 2021.